North Carolina, session 2025, HB659.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, the Local Government
Budget and Fiscal Control Act, is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 159-33.3. Transparent spending and bid reporting.
(a) All local government invoices shall be itemized, disclosing, at a minimum, the payee,
amount paid, items or services purchased, and performance dates. A link to view all quarterly
invoices shall appear on each local government's website, except that a local government without
a website shall keep copies of the quarterly paid invoices for public viewing in a publicly
accessible place at the local government's administrative offices. The invoices shall be
unredacted unless otherwise specifically required by law.
(b) In addition to the information required by subsection (a) of this section, a local
government's website shall provide a link to the top three bids on every project, service, or any
goods purchased with any tax dollars, with quarterly updates. The bids shall be unredacted unless
otherwise specifically required by law."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to invoices paid
on or after that date.
*H659-v-2*